src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-tähkä_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! mato
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattooa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! tähät
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! tähkiä
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! tähkii
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_TAEHTI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  tähti (IX)
+N:e DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ NMN_TAEHTI_01 ;

LEXICON NMN_TAEHTI_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:i     SG-NOM   ; ! tähti
:e SG-PAR_A   ; ! tähteä
:e SG-ILL_V   ; ! tähtee
:e  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:i  lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:e%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! maot
+Pl+Acc:e%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! maot
 PL-PAR_A ;
 PL-ILL_V ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_VARSI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 N_KÄSI ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@s     SG-NOM   ; ! vars

LEXICON N_VOOSI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  voosi:voo
@U.POS.N@+N+Sg+Ess:@U.POS.N@nnAÄ1 K ; ! voonna 
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-käsi_01 ;

LEXICON N_KÄSI
! käsi (XI)
+N:te DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-käsi_01 ; 

LEXICON N-käsi_01
:si     SG-NOM   ; ! orsi
:t SG-PAR_tA  ; ! ortta
:te SG-ILL_V  ; ! ortee
:te%>%^LCns SG-ESS_nnA ;
:te%>%^LCns SG-EXE ;
:te  Oblique-Singular_less-EssExe ;
! Plural
:te PL-NOM   ; ! maot
:s PL-PAR_A-LCns  ;
:s PL-ILL_V   ; ! kässii
:si%>%^LCns PL-ESS_nnA ;
:si%>%^LCns PL-ESS_n ;
:s%>%^LCns PL-EXE ;
:s Oblique-Plural_less-EssExe ;

LEXICON N_MEES
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  mees:mee (??)
+N:he DER-tOin ; !meehetöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-mees_01 ; 

LEXICON N-mees_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:s     SG-NOM   ; ! mees
:s SG-PAR_tA  ; ! meestä
:he SG-ILL_V  ; ! meehe ??
:he  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:he PL-NOM   ; ! meehet
:s PL-PAR_A-LCns  ;
:s PL-ILL_V   ; ! kässii
:s Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_VARIS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  varis (XII)
+N:kse DER-tOin ; !variksetoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-varis_01 ;

LEXICON N-varis_01
:s   SG-NOM  ;
+Sg+Par:s%>t	#   ; ! varist
:s SG-PAR_tA  ;
:kse SG-ILL_V ;
!+Sg+Ill:kse%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
:kse Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:kse PL-NOM   ; ! varikset
+Pl+Gen:ks%>i%>n	#   ; ! variksin
+Pl+Par:ks%>i%>AÄ1	#   ; ! variksia
:ks PL-ILL_V   ; ! variksii
:ks  Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_NAIN
! nain:nai
! 1     2
+N:se DER-tOin ; !kärpäsetöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-nain_01 ;

LEXICON N-nain_01
:n            SG-NOM  ; ! nain
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! naista
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! naist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! naiset
:s      PL-PAR_A   ; ! 
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! 
:s Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_KÄRPÄIN
! kärpäin:kärpäi (XIII)
!   2       3
+N:se DER-tOin ; !kärpäsetöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-kärpäin_01 ;

LEXICON N-kärpäin_01
:n            SG-NOM  ;
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! kärpäistä
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! kärpäist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! kärpäiset
:s      PL-PAR_A   ; ! variksia
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! kärpäisii
:s Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_HOOMIIN
! hoomiin:hoomi (XIII)
!   2       3
+N:se DER-tOin ; !kärpäsetöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-hoomiin_01 ;

LEXICON N-hoomiin_01
:in            SG-NOM  ;
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! hoomista
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! hoomist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! hoomiset
:s      PL-PAR_A   ; ! hoomisia
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! hoomisii
:s Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_MEHILÄIN
! (XIII:kärpäin)<
! mehiläin:mehiläi
!    3        4
+N:se DER-tOin ; !mehiläisetöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-mehiläin_01 ;

LEXICON N-mehiläin_01
:n            SG-NOM  ;
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! mehiläistä
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! mehiläist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! mehiläiset
:s      PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mehiläissiä
:s      PL-PAR_A   ; ! mehiläisiä
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! mehiläisii
:s    Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI
! lapsi:la
+N:pse DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-lapsi_01 ;

LEXICON N-lapsi_01
:ps SG-NOM ; ! laps
:psi SG-NOM ; ! lapsi
:s 		    SG-PAR_tA ; ! veistä
:pse		    SG-ILL_V   ; !
:pse Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:pse     PL-NOM   ; ! veitset
:ps PL-PAR_A   ; ! variksia
:ps PL-ILL_V  ; ! kärpäisii
:ps    Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_VEITSI
! veitsi:vei
+N:tse DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-veitsi_01 ;

LEXICON N-veitsi_01
:tsi SG-NOM ; ! veitsi
:s 		    SG-PAR_tA ; ! veistä
:tse		    SG-ILL_V   ; !
:tse Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:tse     PL-NOM   ; ! veitset
:ts PL-PAR_A   ; ! variksia
:ts PL-ILL_V  ; ! kärpäisii
:ts    Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_INMIHIIN
! inmihiin (XIII-b)
+N:se DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-inmihiin_01 ;

LEXICON N-inmihiin_01
:in            SG-NOM  ; !inmihiin
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! kärpäistä
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! kärpäist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! kärpäiset
:s      PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! variksia
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! kärpäisii
:s    Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_MERI
 N_KEELI ;

LEXICON N_KEELI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  keeli (IX-b)
+N:e DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-keeli_01 ;

LEXICON N-keeli_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:i     SG-NOM   ; ! keeli
+Err/Orth+Sg+Par:t K ;
 SG-PAR_tA  ; ! keeltä
:e SG-ILL_V   ; ! keelee
:e Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:e PL-NOM   ; ! keelet
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! matoloja
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! keelii
 Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_SAMMAL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N:e DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-sammal_01 ;

LEXICON N-sammal_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
     SG-NOM   ; ! sammal
 SG-PAR_tA  ; ! keeltä
:e%>%^LCns SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
:e Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:e PL-NOM   ; ! keelet
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! matoloja
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! keelii
 Oblique-Plural ;


! (XIV)
LEXICON N-XIV
#;

! (XV)
LEXICON N-XV
#;

! (XVI)
LEXICON N-XVI
#;

! (XVII)
LEXICON N-XVII
#;

! (XVIII)
LEXICON N-XVIII
#;

! (XIX)
LEXICON N-XIX
#;

LEXICON N_OIKEHUS
! (XX) oikehus
+N:e DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-oikehus_01 ;

LEXICON N-oikehus_01
+Sg+Nom:s           K  ;
+Sg+Par:t%>tAÄ1	#   ; ! kärpäistä
:e SG-ILL_sse   ; ! oikehuesse
:e Oblique-Singular ;

! Plural
:e PL-NOM  ; ! oikehuet
:ks Oblique-Plural_V ;
:ks PL-PAR_A ;


LEXICON N_VENÄT
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  kevät (XX-a)
! venät:venä
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-venät_01 ;

LEXICON N-venät_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 N-venät_01-Sg ;
:%^SyllBr Oblique-Plural ;
:%^SyllBr PL-PAR_tA ;

LEXICON N-venät_01-Sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 SG-GEN ;
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 PL-NOM ;
:t SG-NOM ;
:t SG-PAR_tA ;
:e SG-ILL_sse ;
:e SG-INE ;
:ee SG-INE ;
:e SG-ELA ;
:e SG-ALL ;
:e SG-ADE ;
:ee SG-ADE ;
:e SG-ABL ;
:e SG-TRA ;
:%^SyllBre%^StretchSyll2 SG-TRA ;
:e SG-ESS_nnA ;
:e SG-EXE ;

LEXICON N_PÄIVYT
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  päivyt:päivy
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-päivyt_01 ;

LEXICON N-päivyt_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 N-venät_01-Sg ;
:e Oblique-Plural_sse ;
:e PL-PAR_tA ;


! (XXI)
LEXICON N-XXI
#;

!
!! ## DERIVATION 
!
!! One derivational process only, DER-t0in.

LEXICON DER-tOin
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@C.POS@+Der/tOin:@C.POS@%>%^WCnst A_KALATOIN ;

!
!! ## DECLENSION 
!

LEXICON Cases
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
!+N+Sg+Nom:     #   ;
!+N+Pl+Nom:i     #   ;
+N+Sg+Ine:%>%^WCnsz%^ShVws    #   ; ! opokka : opokaaz
+N+Sg+Ela:%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! jalka : jalast
+N+Sg+All:%>%^WCnsle    #   ; ! katto : katolle
+N+Sg+Ade:%>%^WCnsl%^ShVws    #   ; ! katto : katool
+N+Sg+Abl:%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! katto : katolt
+N+Sg+Tra:%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! musta : musaks
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n%^ShVws    #   ; ! sotilaz : sotilahhaan, 


! Fed by +N+Pl, +N+Prop+Pl, +A+Pl
LEXICON lOi-Pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%>lOÖ1 Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:lOÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
:lOÖ1 PL-PAR_tA ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_blank
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 PL-ILL_blank ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_sse
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 PL-ILL_sse ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_V
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 PL-ILL_V ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural_hV
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 PL-ILL_hV ;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON Oblique-Plural
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
Oblique-Plural_less-EssExe ;
      PL-ESS_Vn		;
      PL-ESS_nnA	;
      PL-ESS_n	;
      PL-EXE		;


LEXICON Oblique-Plural_less-EssExe
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
      PL-GEN		;
      PL-INE		;
      PL-ELA		;
      PL-ALL		;
      PL-ADE		;
      PL-ABL		;
      PL-TRA		;
      PL-COM		;
      PL-INS	;
      PL-PRL		;
      PL-ABE		;

LEXICON Oblique-Singular
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 Oblique-Singular_less-EssExe ;
      SG-ESS_Vn		;
      SG-ESS_nnA	;
      SG-EXE		;

LEXICON Oblique-Singular_less-EssExe
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
      SG-GEN		;
      SG-INE		;
      SG-ELA		;
      SG-ALL		;
      SG-ADE		;
      SG-ABL		;
      SG-TRA		;
      SG-COM		;
      SG-ABE		;

!
!! ## PLURAL TAGS 
!
!! Plural tags separated from singular ones.


LEXICON PL-ABE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Pl+Abe0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>i%>%^WCnstAÄ1    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ABL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Pl+Abl0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>i%>%^WCnslt    K_Num  ;
!2012-11-03!@R.POS.N@ PL-ABL_Px ;

LEXICON PL-ABL_Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Pl+Abl+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>i%>%^WCnsltAÄ1AÄ1  K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ADE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Pl+Ade0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>i%>%^WCnsV3l    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Pl+Ade000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>i%>%^WCnsl    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Pl+Ade+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>i%>%^WCnsllAÄ1AÄ1  K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ALL
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@+Pl+All00000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>i%>%^WCnslle    K_Num  ; 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@+Pl+All+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>i%>%^WCnsllee  K_Num  ; 

LEXICON PL-COM
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** +Dial/Lauk
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Pl+Com00000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>i%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    K_Num ;

LEXICON PL-ELA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Pl+Ela0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>i%>%^WCnsst    K_Num ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Pl+Ela+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>i%>%^WCnsstAÄ1AÄ1    K_Num ;

LEXICON PL-ESS_Vn
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** +Dial/Soik
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Pl+Ess000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>%^LCns%>i%>V3n K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ESS_n
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
!+Dial/Soik
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Pl+Ess0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>i%>n    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ESS_nnA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** +Dial/Lauk
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Pl+Ess0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>i%>nnAÄ1    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-EXE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@+Pl+Exe000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.EXE@%>i%>nt    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-GEN
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Pl+Gen000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>%^LCns%>i%>V3n    K_Num  ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_blank
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Pl+Ill000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>%^LCns%>i%>    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_sse
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Pl+Ill0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>i%>sse    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_V
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Pl+Ill00:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>%^LCns%>i%>V1    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-ILL_hV
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Pl+Ill000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>i%>he    K_Num   ;

LEXICON PL-INE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Pl+Ine0000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>i%>%^WCnsV3s    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Pl+Ine000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>i%>%^WCnss    K_Num  ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Pl+Ine+PxSg300000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>i%>%^WCnsssAÄ1AÄ1    K_Num  ;

! instruktiva
! only with Px...
LEXICON PL-INS
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INS@+Pl+Instr+PxSg3000:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.DECL-CX.INS@%>i%>nee    #   ; ! lehminee
